Illinois, session 104th, HB387.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 120/1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1401)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Article I may be cited as the the 8Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act.9(Source: P.A. 88-489.)